Maryland, session 2025, HB1456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1456*

HOUSE BILL 1456
Article – Health – General
17–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “AUTOLOGOUS BLOOD DONATION” MEANS A BLOOD DONATION
COLLECTED FROM THE PATIENT FOR USE BY THE PATIENT DURING OR AFTER A
MEDICAL PROCEDURE.
(C) “DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION” MEANS A BLOOD DONATION COLLECTED
FROM AN INDIVIDUAL OTHER THAN THE PATIENT WHO IS IDENTIFIED BY THE
PATIENT, FOR USE BY THE PATIENT DURING OR AFTER A MEDICAL PROCEDURE.
[(b)] (D) “Permit” means a permit issued by the Secretary:
(1) To operate a tissue bank in this State; or
(2) To represent or service in this State a tissue bank that is outside this
State.
[(c)] (E) (1) “Tissue bank” means an establishment that obtains, stores,
processes, distributes, or sells human blood or other human tissue for use in the human
body.
(2) “Tissue bank” includes a blood bank.
17–315.
(A) A TISSUE BANK THAT FACILITATES AUTOLOGOUS OR DIRECTED BLOOD
DONATIONS SHALL COMPLY WITH A PHYSICIAN’S ORDER PRESCRIBING FOR AN
INDIVIDUAL AN AUTOLOGOUS OR DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION.
(B) A TISSUE BANK MAY CHARGE A FEE IN AN AMOUNT THAT IS REASONABLE
AND NECESSARY TO COVER THE ADMINISTRATIVE COST TO THE TISSUE BANK OF
FACILITATING AN AUTOLOGOUS OR DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION ORDERED BY A
PHYSICIAN.
19–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(D–1) “AUTOLOGOUS BLOOD DONATION” MEANS A BLOOD DONATION
COLLECTED FROM THE PATIENT FOR USE BY THE PATIENT DURING OR AFTER A
MEDICAL PROCEDURE.

HOUSE BILL 1456 3
(D–2) “DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION” MEANS A BLOOD DONATION COLLECTED
FROM AN INDIVIDUAL OTHER THAN THE PATIENT WHO IS IDENTIFIED BY THE
PATIENT, FOR USE BY THE PATIENT DURING OR AFTER A MEDICAL PROCEDURE.
19–310.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection and notwithstanding any
other provision of law, a hospital offering bone marrow transplant services shall allow an
individual to donate bone marrow to any individual.
(2) An individual may donate bone marrow to another individual if a
licensed physician determines, based on the physician’s medical judgment, that the
donation of the bone marrow is in the best interests of the donee and there is no substantial
risk of medical injury to the donor.
(C) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A HOSPITAL SHALL
ALLOW AN INDIVIDUAL RECEIVING A MEDICAL PROCEDURE TO PROVIDE AN
AUTOLOGOUS OR DIRECTED BLOOD DONATION ORDERED BY A PHYSICIAN FOR THE
MEDICAL PROCEDURE IF THE HOSPITAL FACILITATES BLOOD DONATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.